Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1265.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1202.1 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1202.1. Instructional Certificate Grade Spans and Age Levels and Duties of Department.--* * *(a.1) The following shall apply to instructional certificates:(1) Notwithstanding 22 Pa. Code § 49.85 (relating to limitations), the certificate designation, grade span and age levels for instructional certificates issued after December 31, 2027, shall be as follows:1234567891011121314151617181920 (i) Early Childhood. The certificate under this subparagraph shall be issued for prekindergarten, kindergarten and grades one through three or three (3) through eight (8) years of age.(ii) Elementary/Middle. The certificate under this subparagraph shall be issued for kindergarten and grades one through eight or four (4) through fourteen (14) years of age, and permits instruction in any subject in grades one through six and in a core academic subject or subjects in grades seven and eight.(iii) Middle/Secondary. The certificate under this subparagraph shall be issued for grades six through twelve or eleven (11) through twenty-one (21) years of age, and permits instruction in any subject in grade six and in a core academic subject or subjects in grades seven through twelve.(iv) Specialized Areas. The certificate under this subparagraph shall be issued for prekindergarten though grade twelve or up through twenty-one (21) years of age.(2) Certificates issued in accordance with 22 Pa. Code § 49.85 shall remain valid for the term of the certificate.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a teacher preparation program may permit an individual who is enrolled at the institution of higher education or in an approved alternative preparation program prior to December 31, 2025, and remains continuously enrolled, to complete the program for the grade level limitations provided under 22 Pa. Code § 49.85(b). The department may issue the appropriate instructional certificate to an applicant who completes the program and meets all other certification requirements.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1265PN1408 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930